Maryland, session 2026, HB0156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0156*

HOUSE BILL 156
Article – Election Law
3–303.
(a) Notification of a change of party affiliation or a change to or from a decline
may be made:
(1) by information provided on a voter registration application by the same
methods provided for registration under Subtitle 2 of this title;
(2) by written notice, signed by the voter and sent by mail or otherwise
delivered to the local board in the county where the voter’s current voter registration
address is located or to which the voter has moved;
(3) by making application in person at the office of the local board in the
county where the voter’s current voter registration address is located or to which the voter
has moved;
(4) by information on a voter authority card or other appropriate form filled
out in a polling place; or
(5) by changing a name or address with the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(b) Party affiliation changes or changes to or from a decline:
(1) shall be processed at any time that registration is open; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, may not be processed
when registration is closed.
(c) (1) If a local board receives a request for a party affiliation change after the
close of registration, the local board shall make the change and it shall become effective for
the next election provided:
[(1)] (I) there is sufficient evidence, as determined by the local boards
pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board, that the request was mailed on or
before the close of registration for that election; or
[(2)] (II) the request was submitted by the voter to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, a voter registration agency, another local board, or the State Board on or
before the close of registration for that election.
(2) DURING A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER WHO HAS DECLINED TO
AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY MAY REQUEST TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL
PARTY AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER OR AT A PRECINCT POLLING PLACE ON
ELECTION DAY.

HOUSE BILL 156 3
3–305.
(a) (1) During early voting, an individual may appear in person at an early
voting center in the individual’s county of residence and apply to register to vote or change
the voter’s address on an existing voter registration.
(2) DURING EARLY VOTING BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY MAY
APPEAR IN PERSON AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S COUNTY OF
RESIDENCE AND APPLY TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER REGISTRATION
TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY.
(E) (1) WHEN A VOTER WHO HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY APPLIES TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER
REGISTRATION TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY DURING EARLY VOTING
BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION, THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER
THE VOTER RESIDES IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VOTER SEEKS TO VOTE.
(2) IF THE VOTER IS A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY, THE ELECTION
JUDGE SHALL:
(I) ISSUE THE VOTER A VOTER AUTHORITY CARD;
(II) HAVE THE VOTER SIGN THE VOTER AUTHORITY CARD; AND
(III) ISSUE THE VOTER A PROVISIONAL BALLOT FOR THE
APPROPRIATE POLITICAL PARTY.
[(e)] (F) The State Board shall adopt regulations and procedures in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the administration of voter registration during
early voting.
3–306.
(a) (1) On election day, an individual may appear at a precinct polling place in
the individual’s county of residence and apply to register to vote.
(2) ON A PRIMARY ELECTION DAY, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS
DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY MAY APPEAR IN PERSON AT A
PRECINCT POLLING PLACE IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S COUNTY OF RESIDENCE AND APPLY
TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER REGISTRATION TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY.

HOUSE BILL 156
(E) (1) WHEN A VOTER WHO HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY APPLIES TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER
REGISTRATION TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY AT A PRECINCT POLLING
PLACE ON A PRIMARY ELECTION DAY, THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER THE VOTER RESIDES IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VOTER SEEKS TO
VOTE.
(2) IF THE VOTER IS A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY, THE ELECTION
JUDGE SHALL:
(I) ISSUE THE VOTER A VOTER AUTHORITY CARD;
(II) HAVE THE VOTER SIGN THE VOTER AUTHORITY CARD; AND
(III) ISSUE THE VOTER A PROVISIONAL BALLOT FOR THE
APPROPRIATE POLITICAL PARTY.
[(e)] (F) The State Board shall adopt regulations and procedures in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the administration of voter registration on election
day.
9–404.
(b) An individual is eligible to cast a provisional ballot if:
(1) the individual declares in a written affirmation submitted with the
provisional ballot that the individual is a registered voter in the State and is eligible to vote
in that election; and
(2) (i) the individual’s name does not appear on the election register;
(ii) an election official asserts that the individual is not eligible to
vote; [or]
(iii) the individual does not have the necessary identification; OR
(IV) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY AND APPLIES TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER
REGISTRATION TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY DURING AT AN EARLY
VOTING CENTER BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION OR AT A PRECINCT POLLING PLACE
ON A PRIMARY ELECTION DAY.
11–303.

HOUSE BILL 156 5
(d) (4) For the purposes of this section, an individual is qualified to vote the
provisional ballot cast if the local board determines that:
(i) the individual is registered in the State;
(ii) if the provisional ballot was cast because the voter failed to
provide required identification, the individual who cast the provisional ballot has met the
identification requirements established by the State Board;
(iii) if the provisional ballot was cast during a period covered by a
court order or other order extending the time for closing the polls, the order has not been
invalidated by a subsequent court order; [and]
(iv) if the provisional ballot was cast because the voter claimed a
different political party affiliation from the political party affiliation on record for the voter,
the voter made a selection in a nonpartisan board of education contest on the ballot; AND
(V) IF THE PROVISIONAL BALLOT WAS CAST DURING AT AN
EARLY VOTING CENTER BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION OR AT A PRECINCT POLLING
PLACE ON A PRIMARY ELECTION DAY BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS NOT AFFILIATED
WITH A POLITICAL PARTY, THE INDIVIDUAL APPLIED TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted:
(1) shall apply to all elections beginning with the statewide primary
election held in 2028; and
(2) may not apply to any special elections held before the statewide primary
election held in 2028.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.